Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5286YH (1) 91 lh/ns H.F. 2136 Section 1. Section 22.7, subsection 13, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 13. a. The Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs âbâ 3 and âcâ , records of a library which, by themselves or when 4 examined with other public records, would reveal the identity 5 of the library patron checking out or requesting an item or 6 information from the library. 7 b. The records shall be released to a criminal or 8 juvenile justice agency only pursuant to an investigation of 9 a particular person or organization suspected of committing 10 a known crime. The records shall be released only upon a 11 judicial determination that a rational connection exists 12 between the requested release of information and a legitimate 13 end and that the need for the information is cogent and 14 compelling. 15 c. The records shall be released to the parent or guardian 16 of a library patron who is a minor child upon the request of the 17 parent or guardian. 18